Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB553.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7(d) of the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 7. Procedures for subsequent review of disapproved final-form or final-omitted regulations.* * *(d) Upon receipt of the commission's order pursuant to subsection (c.1) or at the expiration of the commission's review period if the commission does not act on the regulation or does not deliver its order pursuant to subsection (c.1), one or both 1234567891011121314151617181920 of the committees may, within 14 calendar days, report to the House of Representatives or Senate a concurrent resolution and notify the agency. During the 14-calendar-day period, the agency may not promulgate the final-form or final-omitted regulation. If, by the expiration of the 14-calendar-day period, neither committee reports a concurrent resolution, the committees shall be deemed to have approved the final-form or final-omitted regulation, and the agency may promulgate that regulation. If either committee reports a concurrent resolution before the expiration of the 14-day period, the Senate and the House of Representatives shall each have 30 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, from the date on which the concurrent resolution has been reported, to adopt the concurrent resolution. If the General Assembly adopts the concurrent resolution by majority vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives, the concurrent resolution shall be presented to the Governor in accordance with section 9 of Article III of the Constitution of Pennsylvania. If the Governor does not return the concurrent resolution to the General Assembly within ten calendar days after it is presented, the Governor shall be deemed to have approved the concurrent resolution. If the Governor vetoes the concurrent resolution, the General Assembly may override that veto by a two-thirds vote in each house. The Senate and the House of Representatives shall each have 30 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, to override the veto. If the General Assembly does not adopt the concurrent resolution or override the veto in the time prescribed in this subsection, it shall be deemed to have approved the final-form or final-omitted regulation. Notice as to any final disposition of a concurrent resolution considered 20250SB0553PN0547 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in accordance with this section shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The bar on promulgation of the final-form or final-omitted regulation shall continue until that regulation has been approved or deemed approved in accordance with this subsection. If the General Assembly adopts the concurrent resolution and the Governor approves or is deemed to have approved the concurrent resolution or if the General Assembly overrides the Governor's veto of the concurrent resolution, the agency shall be barred from promulgating the final-form or final-omitted regulation. An agency shall be prohibited from reissuing the same regulation in the future, or promulgating a regulation that is substantially similar, unless the new or revised regulation is specifically authorized by a law enacted after the date on which the concurrent resolution is approved or deemed to be approved by the Governor or after the date on which the General Assembly overrides the Governor's veto of the concurrent resolution. If the General Assembly does not adopt the concurrent resolution or if the Governor vetoes the concurrent resolution and the General Assembly does not override the Governor's veto, the agency may promulgate the final-form or final-omitted regulation. The General Assembly may, at its discretion, adopt a concurrent resolution disapproving the final-form or final-omitted regulation to indicate the intent of the General Assembly but permit the agency to promulgate that regulation.(e) A committee may report a concurrent resolution to initiate the repeal of any regulation currently in effect if the committee conducts a public hearing on the matter prior to reporting the concurrent resolution . If the General Assembly adopts the concurrent resolution by majority vote in both the 20250SB0553PN0547 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Senate and the House of Representatives, the concurrent resolution shall be presented to the Governor in accordance with section 9 of Article III of the Constitution of Pennsylvania. If the Governor does not return the concurrent resolution to the General Assembly within ten calendar days after it is presented, the Governor shall be deemed to have approved the concurrent resolution. If the Governor vetoes the concurrent resolution, the General Assembly may override that veto by a two-thirds vote in each house. The Senate and the House of Representatives shall each have 30 calendar days or ten legislative days, whichever is longer, to override the veto. If the General Assembly does not adopt the concurrent resolution or override the veto in the time prescribed in this subsection, the regulation shall remain in effect. An agency shall be prohibited from reissuing the same regulation in the future, or promulgating a regulation that is substantially similar, unless the new or revised regulation is specifically authorized by a law enacted after the date on which the concurrent resolution is approved or deemed to be approved by the Governor or after the date on which the General Assembly overrides the Governor's veto of the concurrent resolution.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0553PN0547 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021